Utah statutes.
16-10a-1009.   Effect of amendment.
An amendment to articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action
existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the
corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than
shareholders of the corporation.  An amendment changing a corporation's name
does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its
former name.
